

AMF Pensionsforsakring AB: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback
























amf pensionsforsakring ab
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Insurance
Sub-Industry: Life Insurance
AMF Pensionsforsakring AB operates as an insurance company. The Company provides life, health, and disability insurance services, as well as offers pension solutions.




Corporate Information
Address:

Klara Sodra Kyrkogata 18
Stockholm, 113 88
Sweden


Phone:
46-8-696-31-00


Fax:
46-8-411-23-70


Web url:
www.amf.se























From The Web











Key Executives


Marcus Blomberg


Acting Chief Investment Officer







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data









































						Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab Has Increased Its Zoetis (ZTS) Position; Gildan Activewear (GIL) Shorts Decreased By 3.32% - Bibey Post								







 


















 

























































Trending Stock News
Penny Stock News
Market News
Stock News






Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab Has Increased Its Zoetis (ZTS) Position; Gildan Activewear (GIL) Shorts Decreased By 3.32%


					
						July 24, 2017 - By Adrian Erickson

Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab increased Zoetis Inc (ZTS) stake by 183.97% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing. Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab acquired 641,073 shares as Zoetis Inc (ZTS)’s stock rose 14.85%. The Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab holds 989,531 shares with $52.97M value, up from 348,458 last quarter. Zoetis Inc now has $31.31 billion valuation. The stock rose 0.33% or $0.21 reaching $63.37 per share. About 907,568 shares traded. Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS) has risen 29.89% since July 24, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 13.19% the S&P500.







 Gildan Activewear Incorporated (NYSE:GIL) had a decrease of 3.32% in short interest. GIL’s SI was 9.89M shares in July as released by FINRA. Its down 3.32% from 10.23M shares previously. With 522,200 avg volume, 19 days are for Gildan Activewear Incorporated (NYSE:GIL)’s short sellers to cover GIL’s short positions. About 97,961 shares traded. Gildan Activewear Inc (USA) (NYSE:GIL) has declined 3.41% since July 24, 2016 and is downtrending. It has underperformed by 20.11% the S&P500.
Among 9 analysts covering Gildan Activewear Inc. (NYSE:GIL), 5 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 4 Hold. Therefore 56% are positive. Gildan Activewear Inc. had 21 analyst reports since August 4, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. As per Friday, January 29, the company rating was maintained by RBC Capital Markets. The stock of Gildan Activewear Inc (USA) (NYSE:GIL) earned “Sell” rating by Zacks on Monday, August 17. Brean Capital initiated the shares of GIL in report on Thursday, October 15 with “Hold” rating. Credit Suisse downgraded the stock to “Neutral” rating in Tuesday, August 4 report. As per Thursday, July 6, the company rating was maintained by Canaccord Genuity. As per Monday, October 26, the company rating was downgraded by DA Davidson. The firm has “Buy” rating given on Tuesday, August 4 by Desjardins Securities. The company was maintained on Monday, June 19 by RBC Capital Markets. The firm earned “Outperform” rating on Thursday, February 25 by RBC Capital Markets. The rating was downgraded by Zacks on Monday, August 31 to “Hold”.
Gildan Activewear Inc. is a manufacturer and marketer of branded basic family apparel, including T-shirts, fleece, sport shirts, underwear, socks, hosiery and shapewear. The company has market cap of $6.95 billion. The Firm operates through two divisions: Printwear and Branded Apparel. It has a 19.23 P/E ratio. The Printwear segment designs, makes, sources, markets, and distributes undecorated activewear products.
Investors sentiment increased to 1.21 in 2016 Q4. Its up 0.02, from 1.19 in 2016Q3. It increased, as 39 investors sold ZTS shares while 209 reduced holdings. 85 funds opened positions while 215 raised stakes. 450.89 million shares or 0.93% more from 446.74 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported. Stratos Wealth Ptnrs Ltd holds 0.06% or 18,997 shares. Us Bancorporation De, Minnesota-based fund reported 76,938 shares. Westpac Bk holds 206,435 shares. 29,071 were reported by Victory Management Incorporated. Next Fincl Gru holds 3,242 shares. Putnam Limited Liability Corp accumulated 790,676 shares. Highlander Cap Mngmt holds 0.54% or 11,675 shares. Qs Limited Liability reported 0.06% in Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS). Pioneer Inv Management has 1.58 million shares. Metropolitan Life Insurance Ny invested in 264,007 shares or 0.1% of the stock. Moreover, Principal Group has 0.62% invested in Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS) for 9.16M shares. Two Creeks Cap LP accumulated 8.91% or 2.62 million shares. Calamos Limited Com has invested 0.43% in Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS). New York-based Capstone Inv Advisors Limited Liability has invested 0.06% in Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS). The Switzerland-based Swiss Commercial Bank has invested 0.11% in Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS).
Among 19 analysts covering Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS), 15 have Buy rating, 1 Sell and 3 Hold. Therefore 79% are positive. Zoetis Inc had 39 analyst reports since July 24, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. Piper Jaffray reinitiated Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS) on Thursday, December 15 with “Overweight” rating. Jefferies maintained the shares of ZTS in report on Tuesday, March 15 with “Buy” rating. Piper Jaffray maintained the stock with “Buy” rating in Friday, July 14 report. Jefferies maintained Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS) rating on Friday, July 14. Jefferies has “Buy” rating and $7400 target. The rating was downgraded by Zacks to “Hold” on Monday, September 7. Bank of America initiated the shares of ZTS in report on Thursday, September 29 with “Buy” rating. The firm has “Buy” rating given on Tuesday, June 20 by Hilliard Lyons. The rating was maintained by Citigroup with “Neutral” on Thursday, August 4. Cowen & Co upgraded Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS) rating on Thursday, December 15. Cowen & Co has “Outperform” rating and $60 target. PiperJaffray maintained Zoetis Inc (NYSE:ZTS) rating on Thursday, December 15. PiperJaffray has “Overweight” rating and $61 target.








By Adrian Erickson
Echostar Corporation-Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our FREE daily email newsletter.








 

 




 
Free Newsletter Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:






  Recent Posts 

EPS for First Choice Healthcare Solutions (FCHS) Expected At $0.05; Brahman Capital Trimmed By $58.54 Million Its Hilton Worldwide Hldgs (HLT) Position


Edge Asset Management Raised Oaktree Cap Group (OAK) Stake By $7.64 Million, Ruby Tuesday (RT) Shorts Down By 2.26%


1St Global Advisors Has Upped Its General Electric Co (GE) Position, Bluemar Capital Management Has Increased Its Wells Fargo & Co New (WFC) Stake


Herald Investment Management LTD Has Increased Varonis Systems (VRNS) Holding By $520,000; Last Week Alamos Gold (US) (AGI) Coverage


Bluestein R H & Company Decreased Facebook Cl A (FB) Position By $482,540; 6 Analysts Bullish Leucrotta Exploration (CVE:LXE)


Avino Silver and Gold Mines Ltd (ASM) Analysts See $0.04 EPS; 3 Analysts Are Bullish HTG Molecular Diagnostics (HTGM) Last Week


Bluestein R H & Company Has Upped Amazon.Com (AMZN) Stake By $3.90 Million; Shorts at Repros Therapeutics (RPRX) Lowered By 10.91%


Analysts See $-0.94 EPS for Madison Square Garden Co (MSG), Rapid7 (RPD) Sellers Increased By 3.88% Their Shorts


Riverpoint Capital Management Has Boosted Fortune Brands Home & Sec In (FBHS) Stake By $4.25 Million; Dynamic Capital Management LTD Has Boosted Eog Res (EOG) Position


Analysts See $0.15 EPS for Hibbett Sports, Inc. (HIBB); Eagle Global Advisors Has Trimmed Its Rio Tinto Plc (RIO) Stake







© Copyright 2015-2017 Bibey Post Inc - bibeypost.com       About - Our Team - Contact
























AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Buys Baker Hughes Inc, Sells Baker Hughes, a GE Co, Ball Corp - Nasdaq.com











































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search










































AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Buys Baker Hughes Inc, Sells Baker Hughes, a GE Co, Ball Corp


July 24, 2017, 11:38:03 AM EDT
By insider, GuruFocus









































Shutterstock photo


AMF Pensionsforsakring ABNew Purchases: BHI ,Reduced Positions: BLL , DXC ,Sold Out:BHGE,For the details of AMF Pensionsforsakring AB's stock buys and sells, go to http://www.gurufocus.com/StockBuy.php?GuruName=AMF+Pensionsforsakring+ABThese are the top 5 holdings of AMF Pensionsforsakring ABMicrosoft Corp ( MSFT ) - 6,453,995 shares, 4.87% of the total portfolio.Alphabet Inc ( GOOGL ) - 240,799 shares, 2.34% of the total portfolio.Merck & Co Inc ( MRK ) - 2,869,232 shares, 2.09% of the total portfolio.Procter & Gamble Co ( PG ) - 1,976,417 shares, 2.04% of the total portfolio.Verizon Communications Inc ( VZ ) - 3,461,255 shares, 1.93% of the total portfolio.New Purchase: Baker Hughes Inc (BHI)AMF Pensionsforsakring AB initiated holdings in Baker Hughes Inc. The purchase prices were between $53.37 and $61.71, with an estimated average price of $57.6. The stock is now traded at around $57.68. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.26%. The holdings were 386,294 shares as of 2017-06-30.Sold Out: Baker Hughes, a GE Co (BHGE)AMF Pensionsforsakring AB sold out the holdings in Baker Hughes, a GE Co. The sale prices were between $53.37 and $61.71, with an estimated average price of $57.6.Warning! GuruFocus has detected 2 Warning Signs with BHI. Click here to check it out.BHI 15-Year Financial DataThe intrinsic value of BHIPeter Lynch Chart of BHIPremium MembersThis article first appeared on GuruFocus .



The views and opinions expressed herein are the views and opinions of the author and do not necessarily reflect those of Nasdaq, Inc.











This article appears in:
Investing                           
                            
                                , Stocks





Referenced Symbols:

                                        MSFT
                                    
, 

                                        GOOGL
                                    
, 

                                        MRK
                                    
, 

                                        PG
                                    
, 

                                        VZ
                                    












More from GuruFocus



Subscribe




Warren Buffett: I could make you 50% a year on $1 million
This Powerful Chart Made Peter Lynch 29% A Year For 13 Years
A Strategy Ben Graham Used for 30 Years














Related Stocks Articles




Subscribe







Corning Earnings Preview: Growth Momentum To Continue


						7/25/2017 01:44 PM
					



Anadarko's 2Q'17 Earnings Come In Lower Than Expected; Capex Guidance Reduced Due To Weak Outlook


						7/25/2017 01:44 PM
					



What Can We Expect From Boeing's Q2 Earnings?


						7/25/2017 01:44 PM
					














Contributor:GuruFocus
Stock Picks, Portfolios



Follow on:

























Most Popular




Highest Rated








U.S. Fines Frontier, American And Delta For Violating Consumer
J.B. Hunt Transport Services, Inc. Expands e-Commerce Delivery
Microsoft Corporation Q4 Profit Advances 40%
Merck and Pfizer Collaborate with Corning to Modernize
Liberty Media discusses potential deal with Univision -source







Yatra Attains Leadership Position in Corporate Travel With the...
Merck and Pfizer Collaborate with Corning to Modernize ...
PetIQ, Inc. (Nasdaq: PETQ) to Ring The Nasdaq Stock Market Opening...
South Alabama Property Receives CSX Select Site Designation
GameStop and ThinkGeek Bring Comic-Con to You




View All Highest Rated






















Research Brokers before you trade



		Compare Online Brokers
	


Want to trade FX?



		Visit our Forex Broker Center 
	
















Find a Credit Card



                    Select a credit card product by:
                


 Card Type
 Credit Score
 Card Issuer



                    Select an offer:
                





0% APR Credit CardsAirline Credit CardsBalance Transfer Credit CardsBusiness Credit CardsCash Back Credit CardsCharge CardsCharge Cards for BusinessEMV Smart ChipsGas Cards & Auto RewardsHome Improvement Rewards Credit CardsInstant Approval Credit CardsLow Interest Credit CardsNo Annual Fee Credit CardsNo Foreign Transaction Fee Credit CardsPoints Rewards Credit CardsPrepaid & Debit CardsReward Credit CardsStudent Credit CardsTop 10 Best Credit Card Deals and Offers




Bad CreditCredit Quality AverageCredit Quality ExcellentCredit Quality FairCredit Quality GoodLimited or No Credit HistoryPersonal Loans




American ExpressAmerican Express Airline CardsAmerican Express Business CardsAmerican Express Cash Back Credit CardsAmerican Express Charge CardsBarclaycardCapital OneCapital One Cash BackCapital One Fair CreditCapital One MilesCapital One PointsCapital One Prepaid Credit CardsChaseCiti Credit CardsDiscoverDiscover CashbackDiscover MilesDiscover Student Credit CardsMasterCard Credit CardsU.S. BankUSAAUSAA SavingsVisa Credit Cards







Search





Data Provided by BankRate.com






Stocks

Referenced





MSFT








84%



Rate It





GOOGL








88%



Rate It





MRK








84%



Rate It





PG








91%



Rate It





VZ








74%



Rate It































CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX
















































In English | amf.se





























Hoppa över huvudmeny








































About AMF
AMF is 'The Pension Company' for everyone looking for simple and  reliable pension solutions that deliver high returns at a low cost.




With SEK 582 billion (2017-03-31) in assets managed for  approximately 4 million customers, AMF is one of Sweden's leading  pension companies and one of the largest owners on Nasdaq OMX Nordic  Stockholm.
AMF is a limited liability life insurance company that  is owned equally by the Swedish Trade Union Confederation (LO) and the  Confederation of Swedish Enterprise. The company is run according to  mutual principles, entailing that AMF's profits accrue in their entirety  to the customers.
AMF's focus is on occupational pensions for  both individuals and companies. All products are offered either as  traditional life insurance or as unit-linked insurance. In addition, AMF  Fonder AB offers direct savings in mutual funds. AMF has approximately 350 employees.

AMF
SE-113 88 StockholmSweden
Visiting address:Klara Södra Kyrkogata 18Phone:  +46 8 696 31 00Fax: +46 8 411 23 70E-mail: info@amf.se




















AMF´s Governance | amf.se





























Hoppa över huvudmeny






























AMF's governance




AMF is a life assurance company. AMF is owned jointly and equally by the Swedish Trade Union Confederation (LO) and the Confederation of Swedish Enterprise, and is managed according to mutual principles. Customers bear the risk of the company, and the company is not permitted to pay dividends to shareholders.
Regulatory structures
The most important regulatory structures for corporate governance are the Solvency II legislative program, the Swedish Insurance Business Act and the Swedish Companies Act.
The Articles of Association stipulate that AMF may not pay dividends to shareholders. This is also in accordance with the Swedish Insurance Business Act.
The Annual General Meeting (AGM) is AMF's highest decision-making body. The AGM appoints the Board of Directors and the company's auditors. The owners should each appoint a Board member to especially protect insured parties' interests, these being Torbjörn Johansson (LO) and Marie Rudberg (the Confederation of Swedish Enterprise). The AGM appoints the Chairman of the Board. The AGM is held before the end of June each year.
AMF is not governed by the Swedish Code of Corporate Governance. However, the company does comply with the Code in certain respects. The Board of Directors satisfies the Code's requirement of Board member independence of the company and management. However, AMF does not comply with the requirement of Board members' independence of major shareholders. AMF judges that there is no need for a Corporate Governance Report and Report on Internal Controls, in the sense meant by the Code. The background is that the owners should be equally represented on the Board of Directors, and accordingly have complete insight into the work of the Board of Directors. The owners have also decided not to establish a nomination committee.
Each year, the Board appraises its competence and suitability. This process has been developed consistently with the Solvency II Directive. The outcome should be communicated to the owners to constitute supporting data for the election and re-election of the Board of Directors. The appraisal of competence is designed to ensure that the Board of Directors' overall competence is sufficient. The appraisal of suitability applies to each Board member. This deals with questions including other assignments, financial integrity and media image. Conflicts of interest should be reviewed each year, and as necessary.
The Board of Directors and its work
The Board of Directors bears ultimate responsibility for AMF's operations being conducted in accordance with laws and regulations. The Board decides on AMF's strategy, appoints its CEO and formulates internal regulations. The Board of Directors should ensure that there are appropriate internal regulatory structures for risk management and internal controls. It continuously monitors the company's operations and results of operations. The Board is assisted by an independent internal audit. The Board also receives regular special reports on risk and regulations.
The Board of Directors consists of nine ordinary members with no deputies. Two employee representatives should attend Board meetings. The Board meets at least seven times per year.
The Board of Directors has established three committees, the Audit Committee, Finance Committee and Remuneration Committee. All committees are consultative bodies and do not have the right to make decisions.
The Audit Committee consists of four Board members. Marie Rudberg serves as Chairman of the Committee. The Committee monitors the company's work in preparing statutory financial reporting and systems for internal control. This includes monitoring management of the Board's operational risk and regulatory compliance. The Committee also consults on relevant items relating to the Board of Directors' own risk and solvency assessment. The Committee receives support from AMF's Internal Audit function. Normally, the company's external auditors and Head of Internal Audit attend Committee meetings.
The Finance Committee consists of four Board members. Ola Pettersson serves as Chairman of the Committee. The Finance Committee monitors investing activities and ensures measures taken by the asset management function comply with applicable regulations and instructions. The Committee's duties include consulting on an investment plan, proposing it to the Board and continuously monitoring it. The Committee should also consult on those investment decisions that require approval from the Board of Directors. The Committee's duties also include continuously monitoring that risks in the company's asset portfolio are compliant with applicable solvency restrictions. It should also consult on relevant portions of the Board of Directors' own risk and solvency assessments. The Committee consults, and follows up, on the work conducted within the auspices of AMF's ownership policy. The Remuneration Committee consists of three Board members. Pär Nuder serves as Chairman of the Committee. The Committee consults on the company's principles governing compensation and benefits. It also consults on compensation and benefits for the CEO, Deputy CEO, and for other senior managers and central functions. The Committee consults on appraising the competence and suitability of the Board of Directors, senior managers and central functions.
Governance of subsidiaries
AMF Fonder AB and AMF Fastigheter AB are subsidiaries with their own operations. The operations and work of these companies is regulated by their individual Articles of Association and internal policy documents. AMF Fonder AB is also regulated by Swedish mutual funds legislation.
The Board of Directors of the parent company issues owners' directives to subsidiaries. These directives detail the standards the parent company applies to subsidiaries, and how their operations are monitored.
AMF Fonder AB has a Board of Directors that currently has six members. The Chairman and two other Board members are independent of AMF or AMF's owners. Per Bardh is Chairman of the Board (independent).
AMF Fastigheter AB has a Board of Directors that has six members. Three members are independent of AMF or AMF's owners. The Chairman of the Board is Peder Hasslev (Executive Vice President and AMF's Head of Asset Management).
The subsidiaries manage operations that AMF has identified value-added in them being conducted independently, or as required by law. Those parts of operations where there are advantages of coordination or economies of scale with other parts of the group are managed jointly as far as possible. There are agreements between these companies that regulate the purchase and sale of services that comply with internal regulations.
 




















History | amf.se





























Hoppa över huvudmeny






























History




1973
AMF Pension is established to handle STP, a supplementary defined benefit pension scheme for workers in the private sector. Business was conducted in collaboration with SPP. From the onset, AMF Pension focused on low costs and economies of scale.
1992
AMF Pension branches off from SPP and is established as an independent company.
1996
SAF (the Swedish Employers' Association) and LO (the Swedish Trade Union Confederation) decide to replace the defined-benefit STP plan with the defined-contribution SAF-LO Contractual Pension plan. At the same time, the decision is made to open up the plan to competition, starting in 1998. Work is started on building a brand and creating awareness about the company. The slogan "A little more to live on" is launched as part of the company's brand image.
1998
A pension selection process is carried out, where 927,000 people under the SAF-LO Contractual Pension plan are given the opportunity to individually choose a pension company. In competition with the major insurance companies, AMF Pension succeeds in retaining over 60 per cent of its customers.
AMF Pension starts a fund management company and unit-linked insurance company in order to offer unit-linked products to pension-savers.
AMF Pension begins offering private pension savings and ITPK insurance (a complementary occupational pension for salaried employees).
1999
As the decade comes to a close, AMF Pension's asset management can point to a strong record of returns. The average annual total return for the period 1992-1999 was 15.7 per cent, laying the foundation for the company's strong finances.
2000
AMF Pension is the second most popular company in the premium pension (PPM) selection process.
In the process of choosing a company for their occupational pension plans, municipal and county council employees choose AMF Pension more than any other company, accounting for 36 per cent of active choices.
2001
Work is begun on clarifying AMF Pension's future business strategy. An ambitious line-up of projects are initiated to chart out a strategy, organisation, competence succession and financial control according to the concept of being "The Pension Company".
2002
"PA 03" is carried out – a pension selection process in which approximately 195,000 government employees are given the opportunity to choose a company and form of savings for their occupational pension plans. The process is a success for AMF Pension, which is the second most popular company, with 35 per cent of active choices.
AMF "Active" is introduced, a new private pension savings product. AMF Active is a flexible solution that gives policyholders a convenient way of switching their pension savings between traditional life and unit-linked insurance management.
Transfer rights are introduced for all private pension savings.
2003
AMF Pension expands its successful venture into the Corporate market. Among other things, the company is awarded the assignment of handling early retirement pensions for Ericsson employees.
2004
Due to financial strains, many life companies are forced to reduce their pension benefits and rescind previously allocated dividends. Owing to strong finances and proficient asset management, AMF Pension did not have to resort to either of these measures.
2005
The Swedish Financial Supervisory Authority presents its "traffic light" system for supervising life insurance companies. As one of the market's financially strongest companies, AMF Pension announces an extra bonus allocation, giving customers a combined total of SEK 35 billion in pension dividends. To meet new requirements made by the Financial Supervisory Authority and others, AMF Pension establishes a strategic risk management unit. A separate corporate governance unit is also established.
2006
According to an agreement between the Confederation of Swedish Enterprise and the Swedish Trade Union Confederation (LO), surpluses arising from successful asset management are to be apportioned among the employers. In 2006 such surplus was repaid to the employers by waiving them from payment of SEK 10 billion in premiums toward the SAF-LO Contractual Pension plan and waiver of premium insurance with AFA Insurance.
In spring 2006, a major step is taken in the Swedish pension market, with the conclusion of negotiations between the Confederation of Swedish Enterprise and PTK (the Council for Negotiation and Co-operation) on a new ITP plan. The agreement opens up the ITP market to competition with a new agreement that will apply for all salaried employees born in 1979 and later.
2007
AMF Pension was named eligible option for both traditional life insurance and unit link insurance in the new ITP plan. The results of the first choices made by savers showed that AMF Pension was picked by 45 per cent of those who made an active choice. In unit link insurance AMF Pension was number one among those who actively made a choice, with 29 per cent of premiums, and it was number two in traditional life insurance with 27 per cent of premium volume. This means that AMF Pension is the most selected occupational pension company in all pension plans among those who have made an active decision.
In May AMF Pension paid an extra dividend of SEK 7.6 billion to 2.7 million customers. Including this AMF Pension's average dividend interest rate was 14.7 per cent last year, the highest of all occupational pension companies.
2008
In December 2008, it was announced that AMF had again been entrusted with the role of default service pension selection for private sector employees. This means that service pensions for those not making an active choice of company will automatically be assigned to the manager determined by the parties, that is, AMF and our new traditional life insurance. AMF Pension was also designated as an option for both traditional and unit-linked insurance. The new agreement came into effect on January 1 2009.
In 2008, the company launched a new visual identity. This entailed that the Parent Company formally changed name to AMF Pensionsförsäkring AB, abbreviated AMF. In addition, AMF Pension Fondförvaltning AB changed name to AMF Fonder AB and AMF Pension Fastighetsförvaltning AB changed name to AMF Fastighetsförvaltning AB.
2009
In the autumn, private sector employees selected their pension company (SAF-LO collective agreement occupational pensions). AMF's market share was slightly more than 68 per cent, equivalent to 726,000 customers actively or passively entrusting AMF with the management of their occupational pensions. This made AMF the only company that could be selected for both unit-linked and traditional insurance in all four major collective agreement areas (SAF-LO, ITP, KAP-KL and PA 03).
In February, AMF implemented the first reallocation in the company's history (8 per cent). The reallocation was a consequence of sharp stock market declines in late 2008 and early 2009. Despite the reallocation, AMF is the life insurance company that has generated the greatest total return in the past 15 years.
2010
In April, a change was made in AMF's consolidation policy which implied a more direct return model based on returns instead of on dividends. With the change in the consolidation policy the surplus that was previously used to level out the performance over time was no longer needed. Consequently, this money was distributed among AMF's customers, increasing their pension assets by on average of 17 per cent.
In the spring employees in the private sector chose their pension fund (ITP). Of the 144,000 that made an active choice, 32.6 per cent chose AMF. AMF was thereby the most actively selected company at this time.
In the autumn AMF carried out Sweden's longest advertising campaign in which people were given the opportunity to send a text message to themselves or someone else which will be delivered in 20 year's time. Nearly 40,000 people sent a message into the future.
With a total return of 9.8 per cent for 2010, AMF is still on top when it comes to delivering the best pension to customers. AMF is still the life insurance company that has produced the best returns over the past 15 years.
2011
On 1 May 2011, AMF launched a new type of traditional assurance, where the risk level of savings changes progressively. Generally, this means a higher risk level during savers' younger years and a lower risk level as they approach retirement, and that AMF makes guaranteed savings more secure the nearer the saver comes to retirement. In 2011, this product was available for the PA 03 collective pension agreement only.
In spring 2011, AMF acquired 50 per cent of property company Dombron Intressenter AB from AP4 (the Fourth Swedish National Pension Fund). Later in 2011, this company changed corporate name to Rikshem. Late in the year, central Stockholm shopping malls Fältöversten, Ringen and Västermalmsgallerian were added to the property portfolio.
The year featured turbulence on the financial markets and the Stockholm Stock Exchange fell by 17 per cent. AMF's total return was 2.4 per cent.
2012
AMF extended its modernised traditional assurance offering to the KAP-KL collective pension agreement for local government employees, and was the second most selected provider. AMF took a decision to discontinue commissions to intermediaries in the year. AMF launched two new funds, Aktiefond Mix ('Equity Fund Mix') and Räntefond Mix ('Fixed-income Fund Mix').
The total return was 8 per cent, and AMF retained the strongest finances in the sector, even if the year was one of financial and political turmoil on the market. AMF paid SEK 14 billion to policyholders, of which SEK 8 billion was guaranteed pensions and SEK 6 billion returns above guarantee, offering clear evidence of AMF's strength in traditional assurance. Because all profits are returned to savers, SEK 519 million was returned to AMF's customers, funds from fee revenues left after all costs had been covered.
2013
AMF was reassigned as a non-optional provider in the SAF-LO contractual pension segment until 2016. In the SAF-LO and ITP/ITPK contractual pension segments, AMF was also an optional provider for traditional assurance and unit-linked assurance again. In ITP/ITPK, AMF was the most actively chosen provider, in terms of customer numbers and premiums. Total returns were 9.3 per cent in a positive stock market. Because all profits are returned to savers, we were able to cut the charges of 1.2 million traditional assurance savers by 25 per cent. Simultaneously, we returned SEK 481 million to our customers, charge revenue remaining after our costs were covered.
We also reduced the charges on our unit-linked assurance offering by up to 33% for nearly 100,000 unit-linked assurance customers.
2014
In 2014, AMF commenced an extensive process to merge its insurance products to make things simpler for customers, and enable further fee reductions. In the year, AMF delivered a high total return (12.7%) and a strong solvency level (204%). AMF's surplus, totalling SEK 547 m, was returned to its customers, and AMF was rated 4.4 out of 5.0 in its customer satisfaction survey. 2014 was also the first year that AMF presented its sustainability work in its Annual Report in accordance with GRI G4 guidelines. AMF also signed the UN Global Compact, and decided to migrate all its foreign equity portfolio to a sustainability index.


















﻿

























AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Sells 38,959 Shares of Cisco Systems, Inc. (CSCO) - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Cisco Systems Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Cisco Systems Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

ACI Worldwide (ACIW) Earns Daily News Impact Rating of 0.24
Somewhat Positive News Coverage Very Likely to Affect Acxiom Corporation (ACXM) Share Price
Arbor Realty Trust (ABR) Receives News Impact Score of 0.04
Aduro Biotech (ADRO) Given Daily Media Impact Score of 0.25
Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAAP) Getting Positive News Coverage, Accern Reports
Adecoagro (AGRO) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Analysis Finds
KeyCorp Weighs in on KapStone Paper and Packaging Corporation’s Q2 2017 Earnings (KS)
BMO Capital Markets () Receives Consensus Rating of “” from Brokerages
Mercantile Bank Corporation (MBWM) Receives Average Rating of “Hold” from Analysts
Somewhat Positive News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Affect Equal Energy (NYSE:ENT) Stock Price
Critical Analysis: Concordia International Corp. (CXRX) & Tetraphase Pharmaceuticals (TTPH)
Analysts Anticipate Costco Wholesale Corporation (NASDAQ:COST) Will Post Earnings of $1.99 Per Share
Cardinal Health, Inc. (NYSE:CAH) Position Lowered by Charter Trust Co.
Copper Rock Capital Partners LLC Raises Stake in Analog Devices, Inc. (NASDAQ:ADI)
Municipal Employees Retirement System of Michigan Has $466,000 Position in Huntington Bancshares Incorporated (NASDAQ:HBAN)
Morgan Stanley (NYSE:MS) Position Cut by BB&T Securities LLC
Hyman Charles D Has $570,000 Stake in American Electric Power Company, Inc. (NYSE:AEP)
Alliancebernstein L.P. Lowers Position in UMB Financial Corporation (NASDAQ:UMBF)
Skandinaviska Enskilda Banken AB publ Takes Position in UGI Corporation (UGI)
Teachers Retirement System of The State of Kentucky Has $1,411,000 Position in Kite Realty Group Trust (KRG)


 


AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Sells 38,959 Shares of Cisco Systems, Inc. (CSCO)

Posted by Tim Parker on Jul 23rd, 2017 // No Comments 

AMF Pensionsforsakring AB lowered its stake in shares of Cisco Systems, Inc. (NASDAQ:CSCO) by 0.9% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund owned 4,107,804 shares of the network equipment provider’s stock after selling 38,959 shares during the period. Cisco Systems makes up 1.6% of AMF Pensionsforsakring AB’s portfolio, making the stock its 9th largest position. AMF Pensionsforsakring AB owned 0.08% of Cisco Systems worth $138,844,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
Other large investors have also added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Seven Eight Capital LP purchased a new stake in shares of Cisco Systems during the fourth quarter worth about $112,000. Financial Management Professionals Inc. increased its stake in shares of Cisco Systems by 17.7% in the first quarter. Financial Management Professionals Inc. now owns 4,218 shares of the network equipment provider’s stock worth $118,000 after buying an additional 635 shares during the last quarter. Patriot Financial Group Insurance Agency LLC purchased a new stake in shares of Cisco Systems during the fourth quarter worth about $128,000. Jackson Grant Investment Advisers Inc. increased its stake in shares of Cisco Systems by 4,150.0% in the fourth quarter. Jackson Grant Investment Advisers Inc. now owns 4,250 shares of the network equipment provider’s stock worth $128,000 after buying an additional 4,150 shares during the last quarter. Finally, Norway Savings Bank increased its stake in shares of Cisco Systems by 8.3% in the first quarter. Norway Savings Bank now owns 4,858 shares of the network equipment provider’s stock worth $164,000 after buying an additional 373 shares during the last quarter. 75.30% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 




Cisco Systems, Inc. (CSCO) opened at 31.84 on Friday. The firm’s 50-day moving average price is $31.56 and its 200 day moving average price is $32.39. The stock has a market cap of $159.20 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 16.16 and a beta of 1.24. Cisco Systems, Inc. has a 12 month low of $29.12 and a 12 month high of $34.60. 


 Get Cisco Systems Inc. alerts:



Cisco Systems (NASDAQ:CSCO) last posted its quarterly earnings results on Wednesday, May 17th. The network equipment provider reported $0.60 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.58 by $0.02. Cisco Systems had a return on equity of 17.31% and a net margin of 20.61%. The business had revenue of $11.94 billion for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $11.90 billion. During the same quarter in the prior year, the company earned $0.57 EPS. The business’s revenue was down .5% compared to the same quarter last year. On average, analysts anticipate that Cisco Systems, Inc. will post $2.38 earnings per share for the current year. 
The company also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Wednesday, July 26th. Stockholders of record on Friday, July 7th will be given a dividend of $0.29 per share. This represents a $1.16 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 3.64%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, July 5th. Cisco Systems’s payout ratio is 58.29%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: “AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Sells 38,959 Shares of Cisco Systems, Inc. (CSCO)” was first published by BNB Daily and is the property of of BNB Daily. If you are viewing this piece on another domain, it was stolen and reposted in violation of United States & international copyright and trademark legislation. The original version of this piece can be accessed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/23/amf-pensionsforsakring-ab-sells-38959-shares-of-cisco-systems-inc-csco.html. 
A number of equities research analysts have recently issued reports on CSCO shares. Instinet reissued a “neutral” rating and issued a $29.00 price target on shares of Cisco Systems in a report on Monday, July 3rd. J P Morgan Chase & Co reissued a “neutral” rating on shares of Cisco Systems in a report on Monday, June 26th. Vetr downgraded shares of Cisco Systems from a “strong-buy” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $37.03 price target on the stock. in a report on Wednesday, April 26th. Morgan Stanley raised shares of Cisco Systems from an “equal weight” rating to an “overweight” rating and increased their price target for the stock from $33.45 to $39.00 in a report on Monday, May 15th. Finally, Berenberg Bank started coverage on shares of Cisco Systems in a report on Tuesday, April 4th. They issued a “hold” rating and a $35.00 price target on the stock. Twelve analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and twenty-four have assigned a buy rating to the company’s stock. The stock has an average rating of “Buy” and an average price target of $35.32.
In other news, SVP Karen Walker sold 7,802 shares of the stock in a transaction on Tuesday, June 13th. The stock was sold at an average price of $31.29, for a total transaction of $244,124.58. Following the transaction, the senior vice president now owns 178,577 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $5,587,674.33. The transaction was disclosed in a filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through this link. Also, SVP Rebecca Jacoby sold 92,840 shares of the stock in a transaction on Wednesday, June 14th. The stock was sold at an average price of $31.71, for a total value of $2,943,956.40. Following the transaction, the senior vice president now directly owns 271,725 shares in the company, valued at approximately $8,616,399.75. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold a total of 396,179 shares of company stock worth $12,503,407 in the last three months. Corporate insiders own 0.11% of the company’s stock. 
Cisco Systems Company Profile
Cisco Systems, Inc designs and sells a range of products, provides services and delivers integrated solutions to develop and connect networks around the world. The Company operates through three geographic segments: Americas; Europe, the Middle East and Africa (EMEA), and Asia Pacific, Japan and China (APJC). 

 
Receive News & Ratings for Cisco Systems Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Cisco Systems Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 



































Jul 24, 2017 - AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Buys Baker Hughes Inc, Sells Baker Hughes, a GE Co, Ball Corp - GuruFocus.com 


















Jul 24, 2017 - AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Buys Baker Hughes Inc, Sells Baker Hughes, a GE Co, Ball Corp - GuruFocus.com Jul 24, 2017










Home




 Homepage


 Membership Levels


 Membership Data Coverage


 Complete Stock List


 Founder's Message


 The Book


 FREE Trial






Screeners


Value Screens 


 All-In-One Screener


 Industry Overview


 Ben Graham Net-Net


 Undervalued Predictable


 Buffett-Munger Screener


 Magic Formula (Greenblatt)


 Historical Low P/S List


 Historical Low P/B List


 Peter Lynch Screen


 High Short Interest


 52-Week/3Y/5Y Lows


 52-Week/3Y/5Y Highs


 Predictable Companies


 S&P 500 Grid


 Dividend Stocks


 Spin Off List




Downloads | Tools


  Excel Add-In GURUF


 Manual of Stocks™


 Download Financial Data


 Download Guru Portfolios


 Download Stock PDFs


 Download Insider Data


  API


 Mobile App




Strategies


 Performances


 Buffett-Munger


 Undervalued Predictable


 Low P/S


 Low P/B


 Broadest Owned


 Most Weighted






Gurus




 Latest Guru Picks


 Real Time Picks


 List of Gurus (Personalize)


 Gurus Portfolios


 Scoreboard


 Top 10 Holdings View


 Sector Picks


 International Picks


 Aggregated Portfolio


 Consensus Picks


 Guru Bargains


 Hot Picks


 Industry Trends


 Geographic Trend


 ETFs


 Options


 European Shorting






Insiders




 All Insiders


 CEO Buys/Sales


 CFO Buys/Sales


 Insider Cluster


 Guru+Insider Double Buys


 Triple Buys/Sales


 Insider Trends


 Canadian Insider


 Dutch Insider






Market


Market Valuation


 Economic Data


 Industry Overview


 Market-Cap/GDP Valuation


 Global Market Valuation


 Shiller P/E


 Shiller P/E By Sectors


 Buffett Assets Allocation




By Country


 USA


 Australia


 Canada


 China


 Germany


 India


 Japan


 UK


 More...






Articles


Articles


 Editor's Picks


 GuruFocus Research


 Value Ideas


 Interviews with Gurus


 Top Ranked


 Value Idea Contest


 Videos


 Following Authors




Submit Articles


 Writers Wanted


 Value Contest Winners


 Submit Articles Online


 My Articles






Conference




 Value Conference


 Speakers


 Location/Venue


 Register


 After Conference Gathering (Free Drinks)






Tutorials




 Tutorials & Webinars


 FAQ


 Contact Us






Log In




 Free Sign-up


 Log In


 7-Day Free Trial 






Subscribe




 Free Trial ($399/Year)


 Refer a Friend & Earn $50














Search
Compare

Search ▾










Get 7-Day Free Trial



My Portfolios▾
                        
Portfolios Overview
Create New Portfolio
Portfolio Contest


My Gurus▾
                        
Quick Browse
Personalize

My Gurus

Premium Gurus 
Premium Plus Investors 


























 How  to  use  GuruFocus  -  Tutorials
 What  Is  in  the  GuruFocus  Premium  Membership?
A DIY Guide on How to Invest Using Guru Strategies

 insiderArticles 
Bookmark

Print


Tweet















Bookmark Name:









			This page was added to your Bookmark.
		



Members Only. Please Sign Up or Log In first.




			Bookmark of this page has been deleted.
		



AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Buys Baker Hughes Inc, Sells Baker Hughes, a GE Co, Ball CorpJuly 24, 2017 |  About: 
BHI  +0%
BHGE  +0% 



Stockholm, V7, based Investment company AMF Pensionsforsakring AB buys Baker Hughes Inc, sells Baker Hughes, a GE Co, Ball Corp during the 3-months ended 2017-06-30, according to the most recent filings of the investment company, AMF Pensionsforsakring AB. As of 2017-06-30, AMF Pensionsforsakring AB owns 190 stocks with a total value of $8.7 billion.  These are the details of the buys and sells.New Purchases: BHI, Reduced Positions: BLL, DXC, Sold Out: BHGE, For the details of AMF Pensionsforsakring AB's stock buys and sells, go to http://www.gurufocus.com/StockBuy.php?GuruName=AMF+Pensionsforsakring+ABThese are the top 5 holdings of AMF Pensionsforsakring ABMicrosoft Corp (MSFT) - 6,453,995 shares, 4.87% of the total portfolio. Alphabet Inc (GOOGL) - 240,799 shares, 2.34% of the total portfolio. Merck & Co Inc (MRK) - 2,869,232 shares, 2.09% of the total portfolio. Procter & Gamble Co (PG) - 1,976,417 shares, 2.04% of the total portfolio. Verizon Communications Inc (VZ) - 3,461,255 shares, 1.93% of the total portfolio. New Purchase: Baker Hughes Inc (BHI)Warning! GuruFocus has detected 2 Warning Signs with BHI. Click here to check it out. 
BHI 30-Year Financial DataThe intrinsic value of BHIPeter Lynch Chart of BHIAMF Pensionsforsakring AB initiated holdings in  Baker Hughes Inc.  The purchase prices were between $53.37 and $61.71, with an estimated average price of $57.6.   The stock is now traded at around $57.68. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.26%. The holdings were 386,294 shares as of 2017-06-30. Sold Out: Baker Hughes, a GE Co (BHGE)AMF Pensionsforsakring AB sold out the holdings in  Baker Hughes, a GE Co.  The sale prices were between $53.37 and $61.71, with an estimated average price of $57.6. Here is the complete portfolio of AMF Pensionsforsakring AB. Also check out:
1. AMF Pensionsforsakring AB's Undervalued Stocks
2. AMF Pensionsforsakring AB's Top Growth Companies, and
3. AMF Pensionsforsakring AB's High Yield stocks
4. Stocks that AMF Pensionsforsakring AB keeps buying







  Currently 0.00/512345  Rating:  0.0/5 (0 votes)  


Subscribe
            via Email
Subscribe RSS





Comments


Please leave your comment:






More GuruFocus Links



Latest Guru Picks
Value Strategies


Warren Buffett Portfolio
Ben Graham Net-Net


Real Time Picks
Buffett-Munger Screener


Aggregated Portfolio
Undervalued Predictable


ETFs, Options
Low P/S Companies


Insider Trends
10-Year Financials


52-Week Lows
Interactive Charts


Model Portfolios
DCF Calculator


RSS Feed 
Monthly Newsletters


The  All-In-One Screener
Portfolio Tracking Tool










                        GuruFocus has detected 2 Warning Signs with Baker Hughes Inc $BHI.                    

                        More than 500,000 people have already joined GuruFocus to track the stocks they follow and exchange investment ideas.
                    





















→Performances of the stocks mentioned by  insider




→User
            Generated Screeners

mpacholskaStrong in Europempacholskaonly cheap in EuropesamahajoeOptimumsamahajoePrice/EBITDAgoukaradiBanks-Global & Americaspbarker46DividendsDANGORDON*** 5 AND 10 YEAR RETURNbyron codillaValueRanjit.desaiRanjit-08Ranjit.desaiRanjit-07

→BHI Price Chart





$57.68 (1y: +32%)







 













Select portfolio(s):








                        Create a new portfolio



Why you are interested?



            Your selection and notes will be stored in your portfolio.
        


Login to add portfolio















Get WordPress Plugins for easy affiliate links on Stock Tickers and Guru Names
                    | Earn affiliate commissions by embedding GuruFocus Charts

                                                GuruFocus Affiliate Program: Earn up to $400 per referral.  ( Learn More) 













Home  About   Jobs    Advertise    Site Map    Term of Use    Privacy Policy     RSS    Mobile App     Email Alerts    Referral Program    Affiliate Program    FAQ    Contact Us
                               

                © 2004-2017                GuruFocus.com, LLC. All Rights Reserved.
            


                    Disclaimers: GuruFocus.com is not operated by a broker, a dealer, or a registered investment adviser. Under no circumstances does any information posted on GuruFocus.com represent a recommendation to buy or sell a security. The information on this site, and in its related newsletters, is not intended to be, nor does it constitute, investment advice or recommendations. The gurus may buy and sell securities before and after any particular article and report and information herein is published, with respect to the securities discussed in any article and report posted herein. In no event shall GuruFocus.com be liable to any member, guest or third party for any damages of any kind arising out of the use of any content or other material published or available on GuruFocus.com, or relating to the use of, or inability to use, GuruFocus.com or any content, including, without limitation, any investment losses, lost profits, lost opportunity, special, incidental, indirect, consequential or punitive damages. Past performance is a poor indicator of future performance. The information on this site, and in its related newsletters, is not intended to be, nor does it constitute, investment advice or recommendations. The information on this site is in no way guaranteed for completeness, accuracy or in any other way. The gurus listed in this website are not affiliated with GuruFocus.com, LLC.



                    Stock quotes provided by InterActive Data. Fundamental company data provided by Morningstar, updated daily.

















GF Chat {{numOfNotice}}




























×
Manage BookMarks





Close








FEEDBACK
















﻿




























AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Increases Stake in Alphabet Inc. (GOOGL) - Week Herald














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings and News for Alphabet Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Alphabet Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @WeekHerald









Recent Posts

Sanchez Energy Corporation’s (SN) Buy Rating Reiterated at Royal Bank Of Canada
Associates L.L.C. Cdk Buys 215,000 Shares of Kala Pharmaceuticals Inc (KALA) Stock
Public Employees Retirement System of Ohio Sells 27,335 Shares of Zendesk, Inc. (NYSE:ZEN)
Central Garden & Pet Company (CENT) Shares Bought by Bank of America Corp DE
Teachers Retirement System of The State of Kentucky Boosts Position in Terex Corporation (TEX)
People’s United Financial, Inc. (PBCT) to Issue Quarterly Dividend of $0.17 on  August 15th
Scana Corporation (SCG) Lifted to Neutral at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)
Endo International PLC (ENDP) Bonds Trading 1.3% Higher
Insider Selling: Western Digital Corporation (WDC) Insider Sells $2,693,850.40 in Stock
Truck & Bus Gmbh Volkswagen Purchases 158,026 Shares of Navistar International Corporation (NYSE:NAV) Stock
Teleflex (NYSE:TFX) and AngioDynamics (ANGO) Head to Head Analysis
Metropolitan Life Insurance Co. NY Has $1.62 Million Position in Old National Bancorp (NASDAQ:ONB)
HighTower Advisors LLC Sells 292 Shares of Cabot Oil & Gas Corporation (NYSE:COG)
Paloma Partners Management Co Acquires Shares of 8,764 First Hawaiian Inc (NYSE:FHB)
Paloma Partners Management Co Has $294,000 Stake in Lamb Weston Holdings Inc. (LW)
AQR Capital Management LLC Has $3.25 Million Position in ServiceMaster Global Holdings, Inc. (NYSE:SERV)
New York State Teachers Retirement System Takes Position in Bunge Limited (NYSE:BG)
Crescent Point Energy Corporation (CPG) Position Raised by AQR Capital Management LLC
AMAG Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (AMAG) Position Boosted by State Street Corp
BlackRock Inc. Raises Stake in Spectrum Brands Holdings, Inc. (NYSE:SPB)



 


AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Increases Stake in Alphabet Inc. (GOOGL)

					Posted by Anthony Sawyer on Jul 23rd, 2017 // No Comments 


Tweet












AMF Pensionsforsakring AB raised its stake in  Alphabet Inc. (NASDAQ:GOOGL) by 6.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the SEC. The firm owned 240,799 shares of the information services provider’s stock after buying an additional 15,082 shares during the period. Alphabet accounts for  2.3% of AMF Pensionsforsakring AB’s portfolio, making the stock its 2nd largest position. AMF Pensionsforsakring AB’s holdings in Alphabet were worth $204,149,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
A number of other large investors have also bought and sold shares of GOOGL. Norges Bank acquired a new stake in  Alphabet during the fourth quarter valued at about $2,411,505,000.  Franklin Resources Inc. boosted its stake in  Alphabet by 1.0% in the fourth quarter. Franklin Resources Inc. now owns 1,575,345 shares of the information services provider’s stock valued at $1,248,643,000 after buying an additional 16,006 shares during the period.  Fisher Asset Management LLC boosted its stake in  Alphabet by 2.6% in the first quarter. Fisher Asset Management LLC now owns 1,071,363 shares of the information services provider’s stock valued at $908,302,000 after buying an additional 27,598 shares during the period.  Loomis Sayles & Co. L P boosted its stake in  Alphabet by 3.8% in the fourth quarter. Loomis Sayles & Co. L P now owns 955,024 shares of the information services provider’s stock valued at $756,809,000 after buying an additional 35,192 shares during the period.  Finally, Glenview Capital Management LLC acquired a new stake in  Alphabet during the fourth quarter valued at about $605,119,000. 34.33% of the stock is owned by institutional investors. 


 Get Alphabet Inc. alerts:



Alphabet Inc. (NASDAQ:GOOGL) opened at 993.84 on Friday. Alphabet Inc. has a 52-week low of $743.59 and a 52-week high of $1,008.61. The firm’s 50-day moving average price is $968.58 and its 200 day moving average price is $895.39. The firm has a market cap of $687.49 billion, a PE ratio of 33.58 and a beta of 1.00. 




Alphabet (NASDAQ:GOOGL) last issued its earnings results on Thursday, April 27th. The information services provider reported $7.73 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $7.24 by $0.49. The firm had revenue of $20.12 billion for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $19.65 billion. Alphabet had a net margin of 21.84% and a return on equity of 15.16%. During the same quarter last year, the company posted $7.50 earnings per share.  On average, equities analysts anticipate that  Alphabet Inc. will post $33.97 earnings per share for the current year. 
WARNING: This piece of content was originally  reported by Week Herald and is the sole property of of Week Herald. If you are reading this piece of content on another site, it was illegally stolen and republished in violation of US and international copyright legislation. The correct version of this piece of content can be read at https://weekherald.com/2017/07/23/amf-pensionsforsakring-ab-increases-stake-in-alphabet-inc-googl.html. 
GOOGL has been the subject of several recent analyst reports. Instinet  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $925.00 target price on shares of Alphabet in a research note on Tuesday, April 25th. BMO Capital Markets cut Alphabet from an “outperform” rating to a “market perform” rating and cut their target price for the stock from $1,005.00 to $880.00 in a research note on Tuesday, April 4th. Jefferies Group LLC  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $1,200.00 target price (up previously from $1,000.00) on shares of Alphabet in a research note on Friday, April 28th. Loop Capital initiated coverage on Alphabet in a research note on Friday, March 31st. They issued a “hold” rating and a $800.00 price objective for the company. Finally, Zacks Investment Research cut Alphabet from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research note on Monday, July 17th. One research analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, seven have issued  a hold rating and forty-one have issued  a buy rating to the company. Alphabet currently has a consensus rating of “Buy” and an average target price of $1,029.04.
About Alphabet
Alphabet Inc is a holding company. The Company’s businesses include Google Inc (Google) and its Internet products, such as Access, Calico, CapitalG, GV, Nest, Verily, Waymo and X. The Company’s segments include Google and Other Bets. The Google segment includes its Internet products, such as Search, Ads, Commerce, Maps, YouTube, Google Cloud, Android, Chrome and Google Play, as well as its hardware initiatives.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding GOOGL? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Alphabet Inc. (NASDAQ:GOOGL).







Receive News & Ratings for Alphabet Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Alphabet Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News




Sanchez Energy Corporation’s  Buy Rating Reiterated at Royal Bank Of Canada





Truck & Bus Gmbh Volkswagen Purchases 158,026 Shares of Navistar International Corporation  Stock





People’s United Financial, Inc.  to Issue Quarterly Dividend of $0.17 on  August 15th





Central Garden & Pet Company  Shares Bought by Bank of America Corp DE





Insider Selling: Western Digital Corporation  Insider Sells $2,693,850.40 in Stock





Teachers Retirement System of The State of Kentucky Boosts Position in Terex Corporation 






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 
































﻿

























AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Decreases Position in Walt Disney Company (The) (DIS) - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Walt Disney Company (The)
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Walt Disney Company (The) with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Home Depot, Inc. (The) (HD) Stake Held by Vigilant Capital Management LLC
Wells Fargo & Company MN Sells 12,010 Shares of Era Group, Inc. (ERA)
Caesars Entertainment Corporation (CZR) Shares Bought by Wells Fargo & Company MN
Sumitomo Mitsui Asset Management Company LTD Has $43.63 Million Position in Wells Fargo & Company (WFC)
AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Decreases Position in Walt Disney Company (The) (DIS)
Pegasus Partners Ltd. Lowers Stake in Alphabet Inc. (GOOG)
Associated Banc-Corp’s (NYSE:ASB) “Equal Weight” Rating Reaffirmed at Morgan Stanley
Loblaw Companies Ltd (TSE:L) Given Average Rating of “Buy” by Brokerages
Suzanne M. Vautrinot Sells 2,500 Shares of Symantec Corporation (SYMC) Stock
Cray Inc (CRAY) Upgraded to Hold by Zacks Investment Research
Blackrock New Jersey Municipal Bond Trst to Issue Monthly Dividend of $0.06 (BLJ)
National Bank Financial Lowers Tahoe Resources Inc (TSE:THO) to Sector Perform Market Weight
BMO Capital Markets Analysts Give Children’s Place, Inc. (The) (NASDAQ:PLCE) a $112.00 Price Target
FY2017 Earnings Estimate for Endo International PLC Issued By Gabelli (NASDAQ:ENDP)
Brokerages Set SPDR MSCI Europe Energy UCITS ETF (NYSE:STN) Price Target at $32.25
BlackRock Municipal Bond Trust (BBK) Announces $0.06 Monthly Dividend
Aimmune Therapeutics (NASDAQ:AIMT) Receiving Somewhat Positive Press Coverage, Report Shows
Kyocera Corporation (NYSE:KYO) Earns News Impact Score of 0.02
Synnex Corporation (NYSE:SNX) SVP Simon Leung Sells 914 Shares
UBS AG Analysts Give RWE AG (FRA:RWE) a €17.50 Price Target


 


AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Decreases Position in Walt Disney Company (The) (DIS)

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 25th, 2017 // No Comments 

AMF Pensionsforsakring AB reduced its stake in shares of Walt Disney Company (The) (NYSE:DIS) by 1.3% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 1,324,089 shares of the entertainment giant’s stock after selling 17,972 shares during the period. Walt Disney Company (The) makes up about 1.7% of AMF Pensionsforsakring AB’s holdings, making the stock its 7th largest position. AMF Pensionsforsakring AB owned 0.08% of Walt Disney Company (The) worth $150,138,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
Several other large investors have also recently bought and sold shares of DIS. HM Capital Management LLC increased its position in Walt Disney Company (The) by 0.5% in the first quarter. HM Capital Management LLC now owns 2,690 shares of the entertainment giant’s stock valued at $305,000 after buying an additional 14 shares during the period. Barton Investment Management increased its position in Walt Disney Company (The) by 0.3% in the first quarter. Barton Investment Management now owns 7,732 shares of the entertainment giant’s stock valued at $876,000 after buying an additional 20 shares during the period. Mutual of Omaha Bank Wealth Management increased its position in Walt Disney Company (The) by 0.7% in the first quarter. Mutual of Omaha Bank Wealth Management now owns 4,570 shares of the entertainment giant’s stock valued at $519,000 after buying an additional 30 shares during the period. Cordasco Financial Network increased its stake in Walt Disney Company (The) by 2.4% in the first quarter. Cordasco Financial Network now owns 1,549 shares of the entertainment giant’s stock worth $176,000 after buying an additional 37 shares during the last quarter. Finally, American Trust Investment Advisors LLC increased its stake in Walt Disney Company (The) by 0.4% in the fourth quarter. American Trust Investment Advisors LLC now owns 10,791 shares of the entertainment giant’s stock worth $1,125,000 after buying an additional 44 shares during the last quarter. 62.32% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 




Walt Disney Company (NYSE:DIS) opened at 107.00 on Tuesday. The firm has a 50 day moving average of $105.47 and a 200 day moving average of $109.37. The firm has a market capitalization of $167.44 billion, a PE ratio of 18.66 and a beta of 1.39. Walt Disney Company has a one year low of $90.32 and a one year high of $116.10. 


 Get Walt Disney Company (The) alerts:



Walt Disney Company (The) (NYSE:DIS) last posted its earnings results on Tuesday, May 9th. The entertainment giant reported $1.50 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $1.45 by $0.05. The company had revenue of $13.34 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $13.44 billion. Walt Disney Company (The) had a return on equity of 19.81% and a net margin of 16.63%. The company’s revenue for the quarter was up 2.8% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period in the previous year, the company earned $1.36 EPS. Equities analysts forecast that Walt Disney Company will post $5.92 EPS for the current year. 
The business also recently announced a Semi-Annual dividend, which will be paid on Thursday, July 27th. Stockholders of record on Monday, July 10th will be given a dividend of $0.78 per share. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Thursday, July 6th. Walt Disney Company (The)’s payout ratio is currently 27.18%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: This story was posted by BNB Daily and is the property of of BNB Daily. If you are reading this story on another website, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of US and international copyright and trademark laws. The original version of this story can be accessed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/25/amf-pensionsforsakring-ab-sells-17972-shares-of-walt-disney-company-the-dis-updated.html. 
A number of analysts have commented on the stock. BidaskClub upgraded shares of Walt Disney Company (The) from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a report on Monday. BMO Capital Markets reissued a “sell” rating and issued a $95.00 price target on shares of Walt Disney Company (The) in a research note on Sunday, July 16th. Royal Bank Of Canada reissued a “buy” rating and issued a $130.00 price target on shares of Walt Disney Company (The) in a research note on Friday, July 14th. Guggenheim reaffirmed a “buy” rating and set a $122.00 price objective (down previously from $128.00) on shares of Walt Disney Company (The) in a research report on Wednesday, July 12th. Finally, Zacks Investment Research cut shares of Walt Disney Company (The) from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Tuesday, July 11th. Six equities research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, fourteen have given a hold rating and seventeen have given a buy rating to the company. The company currently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $116.17.
In related news, Director Susan E. Arnold sold 12,143 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Thursday, May 11th. The stock was sold at an average price of $109.02, for a total value of $1,323,829.86. Following the completion of the transaction, the director now directly owns 48,673 shares in the company, valued at approximately $5,306,330.46. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through the SEC website. Also, Chairman Robert A. Iger sold 797,578 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, June 9th. The stock was sold at an average price of $105.09, for a total value of $83,817,472.02. Following the transaction, the chairman now directly owns 1,566,484 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $164,621,803.56. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. 13.00% of the stock is currently owned by insiders. 
About Walt Disney Company (The)
The Walt Disney Company is an entertainment company. The Company operates in four business segments: Media Networks, Parks and Resorts, Studio Entertainment, and Consumer Products & Interactive Media. The media networks segment includes cable and broadcast television networks, television production and distribution operations, domestic television stations, and radio networks and stations. 

 
Receive News & Ratings for Walt Disney Company (The) Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Walt Disney Company (The) and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 
































 Holder Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab Upped Crescent Pt Energy (CPG) Stake; Capital Senior Living (CSU) Market Valuation Declined While Portolan Capital Management Has Trimmed Its Stake by $1.29 Million - The San Times      
            TrendingMarketFinanceContactPrivacy PolicyHolder Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab Upped Crescent Pt Energy (CPG) Stake; Capital Senior Living (CSU) Market Valuation Declined While Portolan Capital Management Has Trimmed Its Stake by $1.29 Million July 20, 2017 - By Darrin Black George Mccabe decreased its stake in Capital Senior Living Corporation (CSU) by 17.4% based on its latest 2016Q4 regulatory filing with the SEC. Portolan Capital Management Llc sold 80,631 shares as the company’s stock declined 16.71% while stock markets rallied. The hedge fund run by George Mccabe held 382,860 shares of the hospital and nursing management company at the end of 2016Q4, valued at $6.15 million, down from 463,491 at the end of the previous reported quarter. Portolan Capital Management Llc who had been investing in Capital Senior Living Corporation for a number of months, seems to be less bullish one the $446.94 million market cap company. It closed at $14.61 lastly. It is down 22.14% since July 20, 2016 and is downtrending. It has underperformed by 38.84% the S&P500.Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab increased its stake in Crescent Pt Energy Corp (CPG) by 10.79% based on its latest 2016Q4 regulatory filing with the SEC. Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab bought 43,300 shares as the company’s stock declined 20.31% while stock markets rallied. The institutional investor held 444,621 shares of the oil & gas production company at the end of 2016Q4, valued at $6.05M, up from 401,321 at the end of the previous reported quarter. Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab who had been investing in Crescent Pt Energy Corp for a number of months, seems to be bullish on the $4.26 billion market cap company. It closed at $7.81 lastly. It is down 40.46% since July 20, 2016 and is downtrending. It has underperformed by 57.16% the S&P500.    Investors sentiment decreased to 0.85 in Q4 2016. Its down 0.68, from 1.53 in 2016Q3. It fall, as 29 investors sold CPG shares while 52 reduced holdings. 14 funds opened positions while 55 raised stakes. 217.82 million shares or 4.58% more from 208.27 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported. Goldman Sachs Gp Inc owns 248,493 shares or 0% of their US portfolio. Winfield Assocs Incorporated invested in 210 shares or 0% of the stock. Vanguard Inc reported 12.10M shares. Mackenzie Fin invested 0.91% of its portfolio in Crescent Point Energy Corporation Ordinary Shares (Canada) (NYSE:CPG). Riverhead Cap Llc invested in 0% or 1,500 shares. D E Shaw And reported 48,464 shares. Jpmorgan Chase And holds 0% or 453,011 shares in its portfolio. Bank Of Montreal Can owns 14.54M shares. Renaissance Limited Liability Corp reported 0% stake. Guggenheim Capital Limited Liability Com invested in 0.01% or 328,070 shares. Moreover, Da Davidson Co has 0% invested in Crescent Point Energy Corporation Ordinary Shares (Canada) (NYSE:CPG) for 3,000 shares. Addenda Capital Inc owns 603,331 shares. Agf Invs reported 53,124 shares stake. Manufacturers Life Ins The holds 3.61 million shares or 0.07% of its portfolio. Pinebridge Limited Partnership holds 26,978 shares.Among 4 analysts covering Crescent Point Energy (NYSE:CPG), 4 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 0 Hold. Therefore 100% are positive. Crescent Point Energy had 7 analyst reports since July 22, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. Dundee Securities downgraded the stock to “Neutral” rating in Friday, September 9 report. UBS downgraded the stock to “Buy” rating in Friday, August 14 report. Dundee Securities upgraded the stock to “Buy” rating in Friday, November 11 report. The stock has “Overweight” rating by Barclays Capital on Friday, July 22. Barclays Capital downgraded Crescent Point Energy Corporation Ordinary Shares (Canada) (NYSE:CPG) rating on Wednesday, July 22. Barclays Capital has “Equal Weight” rating and $23 target. Barclays Capital upgraded the stock to “Overweight” rating in Thursday, October 29 report.Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab, which manages about $8.59B US Long portfolio, decreased its stake in Boston Properties Inc (NYSE:BXP) by 151,240 shares to 456,144 shares, valued at $57.37M in 2016Q4, according to the filing. It also reduced its holding in Simon Ppty Group Inc New (NYSE:SPG) by 82,719 shares in the quarter, leaving it with 533,521 shares, and cut its stake in Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (NYSE:TMO).More news for Crescent Point Energy Corporation Ordinary Shares (Canada) (NYSE:CPG) were recently published by: Benzinga.com, which released: “Strength In Crescent Point Due To Report Of An Activist Investor” on February 17, 2017. Theglobeandmail.com‘s article titled: “Toronto Stock Exchange: CPG” and published on October 08, 2015 is yet another important article.Investors sentiment decreased to 0.86 in Q4 2016. Its down 0.41, from 1.27 in 2016Q3. It is negative, as 15 investors sold CSU shares while 35 reduced holdings. 13 funds opened positions while 30 raised stakes. 29.19 million shares or 9.94% more from 26.55 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported. Cubist Systematic Strategies Limited Company invested in 6,059 shares. Steinberg Asset Management Ltd Limited Liability Company invested in 3.06% or 501,445 shares. Tower Rech Capital Ltd Liability Co (Trc) invested 0% of its portfolio in Capital Senior Living Corporation (NYSE:CSU). 29,200 are held by New York State Common Retirement Fund. California Pub Employees Retirement Systems has 0% invested in Capital Senior Living Corporation (NYSE:CSU) for 74,900 shares. Royal Savings Bank Of Canada has 2,070 shares. Invesco holds 0% or 23,602 shares in its portfolio. Sentinel Asset Mngmt has 0.36% invested in Capital Senior Living Corporation (NYSE:CSU) for 895,830 shares. Blackrock Fund Advsrs, California-based fund reported 1.00M shares. Barclays Public Limited Liability Com has invested 0% in Capital Senior Living Corporation (NYSE:CSU). American Grp Incorporated has 0% invested in Capital Senior Living Corporation (NYSE:CSU) for 16,178 shares. 676,800 were reported by Renaissance Tech Ltd Liability Corporation. 49,414 were reported by Gsa Ptnrs Llp. Voya Investment Mgmt Limited reported 12,858 shares. 121,034 were accumulated by Schwab Charles Invest Management Incorporated.Among 2 analysts covering Capital Senior (NYSE:CSU), 2 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 0 Hold. Therefore 100% are positive. Capital Senior had 3 analyst reports since September 4, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. JMP Securities maintained Capital Senior Living Corporation (NYSE:CSU) on Wednesday, August 24 with “Market Outperform” rating. The stock has “Buy” rating by Sidoti on Friday, September 4.Analysts await Capital Senior Living Corporation (NYSE:CSU) to report earnings on August, 1. After $-0.07 actual earnings per share reported by Capital Senior Living Corporation for the previous quarter, Wall Street now forecasts 128.57% negative EPS growth.Since March 1, 2017, it had 1 buying transaction, and 2 insider sales for $3.70 million activity. The insider Arbiter Partners Capital Management LLC bought $3.73M.Portolan Capital Management Llc, which manages about $535.17M and $742.73M US Long portfolio, upped its stake in Ferroglobe Plc by 403,584 shares to 1.20 million shares, valued at $12.96M in 2016Q4, according to the filing. It also increased its holding in Lumentum Holdings Inc. by 34,575 shares in the quarter, for a total of 84,163 shares, and has risen its stake in Care.Com Inc. (NYSE:CRCM).Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our FREE daily email newsletter.       Free Email NewsletterEnter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our free daily email newsletter:   Recent Posts Analysts See $0.38 EPS for Liberty Sirius XM Group (LSXMK); LPKF Laser & Electronics AG (ETR:LPK) Had 1 Bulls EPS for Darling Ingredients (DAR) Expected At $0.09, Deckers Outdoor (DECK)’s Sentiment Is 0.99 Analysts See $-1.21 EPS for Beigene Ltd (ADR) (BGNE); Ghp Investment Advisors Has Raised Its Actuant (ATU) Position Netease (NTES) Holding Has Boosted by Alta Advisers Ltd; Salzhauer Michael Has Lifted Its Comerica (CMA) Stake by $659,600 As Heritage (HCCI) Valuation Rose, Cortina Asset Management Has Decreased Its Position by $1.58 Million; Paccar (PCAR) Shareholder Gideon Capital Advisors Has Lowered Its Position by $1.15 Million as Share Value Declined Vical (VICL) Analysts See $-0.28 EPS; Mdu Resources Group (MDU) Sentiment Is 0.89 $0.66 EPS Expected for TransMontaigne Partners L.P. (TLP); Cornerstone Real Estate Advisers Has Upped By $670,100 Its Spirit Realty Capital (SRC) Stake $0.16 EPS Expected for Time (TIME); Westar Energy (WR) Has 1.09 Sentiment Analysts See $-0.02 EPS for Neovasc (NVCN), Commonwealth Equity Services Has Lowered Cummins (CMI) Stake Perkins Investment Management Has Increased Its Unilever Plc (UL) Position by $1.11 Million; Maple Capital Management Has Lifted Its Cf Industries Holdings  (CF) Stake by $343,480 © Copyright 2011-2017 SanTimes.comGet the Next Big Winner in your inbox Before the BellLists*Consumer Eagle           














Watch List News

















Home
About
Staff
Privacy Policy
Contact
























Headlines
Business
US News
Health
World
Investing
Technology

 



Latest News



 



Schlumberger N.V. (NYSE:SLB) Receives Buy Rating from Seaport Global Securities

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Nicole Kennedy 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Seaport Global Securities reissued their buy rating on shares of Schlumberger N.V. (NYSE:SLB) in a report issued on Friday morning. SLB has been the topic of several other reports. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Schlumberger N.V. from a sell rating to a hold rating in a research report on Thursday, July 20th. Scotiabank set […]							Continue Reading








 



LegacyTexas Financial Group, Inc. (LTXB) Rating Increased to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Nicole Kennedy 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of LegacyTexas Financial Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:LTXB) from a sell rating to a hold rating in a research report sent to investors on Friday morning. According to Zacks, “LegacyTexas Financial Group, Inc. is a bank holding company. The company’s holdings include LegacyTexas Bank. The Bank offers commercial, small business, and consumer […]							Continue Reading








 



Kite Realty Group Trust (KRG) Rating Increased to Buy at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Mark Dietrich 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Kite Realty Group Trust (NYSE:KRG) from a hold rating to a buy rating in a report released on Friday. Zacks Investment Research currently has $22.00 price target on the real estate investment trust’s stock. According to Zacks, “Kite Realty Group Trust is a full-service, vertically integrated real estate investment […]							Continue Reading








 



Range Resources Corporation (RRC) PT Lowered to $34.00 at Citigroup Inc.

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Nicole Kennedy 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Range Resources Corporation (NYSE:RRC) had its target price cut by Citigroup Inc. from $42.00 to $34.00 in a report issued on Friday morning. They currently have a buy rating on the oil and gas exploration company’s stock. A number of other brokerages have also weighed in on RRC. BidaskClub upgraded Range Resources Corporation from a […]							Continue Reading








 



PPG Industries, Inc. (NYSE:PPG) Price Target Increased to $115.00 by Analysts at Deutsche Bank AG

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Nicole Kennedy 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
PPG Industries, Inc. (NYSE:PPG) had its price target boosted by Deutsche Bank AG from $110.00 to $115.00 in a research report sent to investors on Friday morning. The firm currently has a hold rating on the specialty chemicals company’s stock. Other analysts have also recently issued reports about the company. TheStreet upgraded PPG Industries from […]							Continue Reading








 



Skechers U.S.A., Inc. (NYSE:SKX) Price Target Raised to $34.00 at Citigroup Inc.

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Skechers U.S.A., Inc. (NYSE:SKX) had its price objective boosted by Citigroup Inc. from $30.00 to $34.00 in a research note released on Friday morning. The firm currently has a buy rating on the textile maker’s stock. SKX has been the topic of several other reports. UBS AG raised shares of Skechers U.S.A. from a neutral […]							Continue Reading








 



Heartland Express, Inc. (NASDAQ:HTLD) Raised to Buy at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Heartland Express, Inc. (NASDAQ:HTLD) from a hold rating to a buy rating in a research note issued to investors on Friday morning. They currently have $24.00 price objective on the transportation company’s stock. According to Zacks, “Heartland Express, Inc. is a short-to-medium haul truckload carrier based near Iowa City, […]							Continue Reading








 



Southwestern Energy Company (SWN) Given New $8.00 Price Target at Citigroup Inc.

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Southwestern Energy Company (NYSE:SWN) had its price objective trimmed by Citigroup Inc. from $9.00 to $8.00 in a research report sent to investors on Friday. The brokerage currently has a buy rating on the energy company’s stock. A number of other research analysts have also recently commented on SWN. Stifel Nicolaus started coverage on Southwestern […]							Continue Reading








 



La Quinta Holdings Inc. (NYSE:LQ) Downgraded to “Hold” at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research lowered shares of La Quinta Holdings Inc. (NYSE:LQ) from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research report released on Friday. According to Zacks, “La Quinta Holdings Inc. is an owner, operator and franchisor of select-service hotels in the United States, primarily serving the midscale and upper-midscale segments. It provides […]							Continue Reading








 



Orix Corp Ads (IX) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Orix Corp Ads (NYSE:IX) from a strong sell rating to a hold rating in a research note published on Friday morning. According to Zacks, “ORIX CORP-ADR is a diversified financial services institution with diverse operations in both corporate and retail finance, including: leasing, lending, rentals, life insurance, real estate […]							Continue Reading








 



HDFC Bank Limited (NYSE:HDB) Stock Rating Upgraded by Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of HDFC Bank Limited (NYSE:HDB) from a hold rating to a buy rating in a research report released on Friday morning. They currently have $103.00 target price on the bank’s stock. According to Zacks, “HDFC BANK’s mission is to be a World Class Indian Bank. The Bank’s aim is to […]							Continue Reading








 



KeyCorp’s (KEY) Buy Rating Reaffirmed at Piper Jaffray Companies

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Piper Jaffray Companies restated their buy rating on shares of KeyCorp (NYSE:KEY) in a research note released on Friday morning. Piper Jaffray Companies currently has a $20.50 price target on the financial services provider’s stock. KEY has been the topic of several other research reports. DA Davidson raised shares of KeyCorp from a neutral rating […]							Continue Reading








 



Home BancShares, Inc. (NASDAQ:HOMB) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Piper Jaffray Companies

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Piper Jaffray Companies reiterated their hold rating on shares of Home BancShares, Inc. (NASDAQ:HOMB) in a report issued on Friday morning. The brokerage currently has a $27.00 target price on the financial services provider’s stock. Other analysts have also issued research reports about the company. BidaskClub raised Home BancShares from a strong sell rating to […]							Continue Reading








 



MB Financial Inc. (MBFI) Downgraded by Piper Jaffray Companies to “Neutral”

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Piper Jaffray Companies lowered shares of MB Financial Inc. (NASDAQ:MBFI) from an overweight rating to a neutral rating in a research note released on Friday morning, MarketBeat Ratings reports. Piper Jaffray Companies currently has $44.00 price target on the bank’s stock. Several other brokerages also recently commented on MBFI. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of […]							Continue Reading








 



Hess Midstream Partners LP (HESM) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research to “Hold”

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research cut shares of Hess Midstream Partners LP (NASDAQ:HESM) from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research note issued to investors on Friday. According to Zacks, “Hess Midstream Partners LP is a master limited partnership company. It own, operate, develop and acquire a set of midstream assets to provide services […]							Continue Reading








 



CGI Group, Inc. (GIB) Lifted to Strong-Buy at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of CGI Group, Inc. (NYSE:GIB) (TSE:GIB.A) from a hold rating to a strong-buy rating in a research note published on Friday morning. They currently have $60.00 price objective on the technology company’s stock. According to Zacks, “CGI provides the full range of IT services including consulting, systems integration and the […]							Continue Reading








 



Allscripts Healthcare Solutions, Inc. (NASDAQ:MDRX) Given “Hold” Rating at Piper Jaffray Companies

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Piper Jaffray Companies restated their hold rating on shares of Allscripts Healthcare Solutions, Inc. (NASDAQ:MDRX) in a research note published on Friday. They currently have a $14.00 price target on the software maker’s stock. Several other equities research analysts have also recently weighed in on MDRX. Bank of America Corporation began coverage on Allscripts Healthcare […]							Continue Reading








 



Harvard Bioscience, Inc. (HBIO) Rating Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research downgraded shares of Harvard Bioscience, Inc. (NASDAQ:HBIO) from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research note published on Friday morning. According to Zacks, “HARVARD BIOSCIENCE develops, manufactures and markets tools used in drug discovery research at pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies, universities and government laboratories. “ Separately, ValuEngine lowered shares […]							Continue Reading








 



Piper Jaffray Companies Reaffirms Buy Rating for Laureate Education Inc. (NASDAQ:LAUR)

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Piper Jaffray Companies restated their buy rating on shares of Laureate Education Inc. (NASDAQ:LAUR) in a report released on Friday. They currently have a $19.00 price target on the stock. Other equities analysts also recently issued reports about the company. Zacks Investment Research raised Laureate Education from a hold rating to a buy rating and […]							Continue Reading








 



KB Financial Group Inc (NYSE:KB) Lifted to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of KB Financial Group Inc (NYSE:KB) from a sell rating to a buy rating in a research report sent to investors on Friday morning. They currently have $58.00 target price on the bank’s stock. According to Zacks, “KOOKMIN BANK, formerly KB Financial Group Inc., is a commercial bank in Korea. […]							Continue Reading








 



Glaukos Corporation (NYSE:GKOS) Stock Rating Upgraded by Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Glaukos Corporation (NYSE:GKOS) from a hold rating to a buy rating in a report issued on Friday morning. Zacks Investment Research currently has $46.00 price objective on the medical instruments supplier’s stock. According to Zacks, “Glaukos Corporation is an ophthalmic medical technology company. The Company develops, manufactures and markets […]							Continue Reading








 



Medidata Solutions, Inc. (NASDAQ:MDSO) Downgraded to “Sell” at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research cut shares of Medidata Solutions, Inc. (NASDAQ:MDSO) from a hold rating to a sell rating in a research note issued to investors on Friday morning. According to Zacks, “Medidata Solutions is a leading global provider of hosted clinical development solutions that enhance the efficiency of customers’ clinical development processes and optimize their […]							Continue Reading








 



Noble Energy Inc. (NBL) Price Target Cut to $38.00

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Mark Dietrich 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Noble Energy Inc. (NYSE:NBL) had its price objective cut by Citigroup Inc. from $45.00 to $38.00 in a research note published on Friday. They currently have a buy rating on the oil and gas development company’s stock. Other research analysts have also recently issued reports about the stock. Scotiabank reiterated a hold rating and set […]							Continue Reading








 



MGIC Investment Corporation (NYSE:MTG) Price Target Increased to $13.50 by Analysts at Deutsche Bank AG

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Mark Dietrich 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
MGIC Investment Corporation (NYSE:MTG) had its price objective hoisted by Deutsche Bank AG from $13.00 to $13.50 in a report issued on Friday. Deutsche Bank AG currently has a buy rating on the insurance provider’s stock. Other research analysts also recently issued reports about the stock. MKM Partners reaffirmed a buy rating and issued a […]							Continue Reading








 



Navios Maritime Holdings Inc. (NM) Rating Increased to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Mark Dietrich 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Navios Maritime Holdings Inc. (NYSE:NM) from a strong sell rating to a hold rating in a report published on Friday. According to Zacks, “Navios Maritime Holdings Inc. is a seaborne shipping and logistics company engaged in the transport and transshipment of drybulk commodities including iron ore, coal and grain. […]							Continue Reading








 



Parsley Energy, Inc. (PE) Given a $50.00 Price Target by Citigroup Inc. Analysts

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Mark Dietrich 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Citigroup Inc. set a $50.00 price target on Parsley Energy, Inc. (NYSE:PE) in a report published on Friday. The firm currently has a buy rating on the oil and natural gas company’s stock. Several other research firms have also recently weighed in on PE. FBR & Co reissued a buy rating on shares of Parsley […]							Continue Reading








 



Newfield Exploration Company (NYSE:NFX) Price Target Cut to $36.00 by Analysts at Citigroup Inc.

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Newfield Exploration Company (NYSE:NFX) had its target price decreased by Citigroup Inc. from $50.00 to $36.00 in a report issued on Friday morning. Citigroup Inc. currently has a buy rating on the energy company’s stock. Other research analysts also recently issued reports about the stock. Barclays PLC restated a hold rating and set a $34.00 […]							Continue Reading








 



Hess Corporation (NYSE:HES) Price Target Lowered to $49.00 at Citigroup Inc.

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Hanz Christensen 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Hess Corporation (NYSE:HES) had its price target reduced by Citigroup Inc. from $55.00 to $49.00 in a research report released on Friday morning. They currently have a neutral rating on the oil and gas producer’s stock. Several other brokerages have also recently commented on HES. Capital One Financial Corporation cut shares of Hess Corporation from […]							Continue Reading








 



Citigroup Inc. Increases Microsoft Corporation (MSFT) Price Target to $74.00

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Hanz Christensen 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT) had its price objective increased by Citigroup Inc. from $72.00 to $74.00 in a research note published on Friday morning. Citigroup Inc. currently has a sell rating on the software giant’s stock. MSFT has been the subject of several other research reports. Morgan Stanley reiterated an overweight rating and issued a $80.00 […]							Continue Reading








 



Intellipharmaceutics International Inc. (IPCI) Given a $6.00 Price Target by Maxim Group Analysts

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Hanz Christensen 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Maxim Group set a $6.00 price target on Intellipharmaceutics International Inc. (NASDAQ:IPCI) (TSE:I) in a research report released on Friday. The brokerage currently has a buy rating on the stock. “We note the Anesthetic and Analgesic Drug Products Advisory Committee and the Drug Safety and Risk Management Advisory Committees will hold discussions on the new […]							Continue Reading








 



Deutsche Bank AG Cuts LaSalle Hotel Properties (NYSE:LHO) Price Target to $27.00

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Hanz Christensen 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
LaSalle Hotel Properties (NYSE:LHO) had its target price lowered by Deutsche Bank AG from $28.00 to $27.00 in a research note published on Friday. Deutsche Bank AG currently has a hold rating on the real estate investment trust’s stock. Other equities research analysts have also recently issued research reports about the company. Robert W. Baird […]							Continue Reading








 



Infinera Corporation (INFN) Price Target Raised to $10.00 at Citigroup Inc.

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Hanz Christensen 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Infinera Corporation (NASDAQ:INFN) had its price target raised by Citigroup Inc. from $8.50 to $10.00 in a research note published on Friday. Citigroup Inc. currently has a sell rating on the communications equipment provider’s stock. A number of other research firms also recently commented on INFN. BidaskClub upgraded Infinera Corporation from a strong sell rating […]							Continue Reading








 



Kosmos Energy Ltd. (KOS) Price Target Lowered to $9.00 at Citigroup Inc.

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Hanz Christensen 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Kosmos Energy Ltd. (NYSE:KOS) had its price target trimmed by Citigroup Inc. from $10.00 to $9.00 in a research note issued to investors on Friday. The brokerage currently has a buy rating on the oil and gas producer’s stock. Other equities analysts have also recently issued reports about the company. BMO Capital Markets reiterated a […]							Continue Reading








 



Inphi Corporation (NYSE:IPHI) PT Lowered to $46.00

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Hanz Christensen 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Inphi Corporation (NYSE:IPHI) had its price target trimmed by Deutsche Bank AG from $47.00 to $46.00 in a report released on Friday. The brokerage currently has a buy rating on the semiconductor company’s stock. Other equities analysts also recently issued reports about the company. B. Riley reaffirmed a buy rating and issued a $48.25 target […]							Continue Reading








 



Plexus Corp. (PLXS) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Stifel Nicolaus

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Hanz Christensen 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Stifel Nicolaus reaffirmed their hold rating on shares of Plexus Corp. (NASDAQ:PLXS) in a report released on Friday morning. The brokerage currently has a $54.00 target price on the technology company’s stock, up from their previous target price of $50.00. Several other brokerages have also recently weighed in on PLXS. J P Morgan Chase & […]							Continue Reading








 



Nektar Therapeutics (NKTR) Rating Reiterated by Jefferies Group LLC

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Jefferies Group LLC reiterated their buy rating on shares of Nektar Therapeutics (NASDAQ:NKTR) in a research report sent to investors on Friday morning. They currently have a $23.00 target price on the biopharmaceutical company’s stock. A number of other research firms have also recently commented on NKTR. William Blair restated an outperform rating on shares […]							Continue Reading








 



Microsoft Corporation (MSFT) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Barclays PLC

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Barclays PLC restated their overweight rating on shares of Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT) in a report issued on Friday morning. They currently have a $82.00 target price on the software giant’s stock, up from their prior target price of $77.00. A number of other research analysts have also weighed in on MSFT. Deutsche Bank AG reaffirmed […]							Continue Reading








 



O’Reilly Automotive’s (NASDAQ:ORLY) Hold Rating Reaffirmed at Deutsche Bank AG

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Deutsche Bank AG restated their hold rating on shares of O’Reilly Automotive, Inc. (NASDAQ:ORLY) in a research note released on Friday morning. They currently have a $190.00 price target on the specialty retailer’s stock, down from their previous price target of $272.00. ORLY has been the subject of a number of other research reports. Barclays […]							Continue Reading








 



InterXion Holding N.V. (INXN) Receives “Buy” Rating from Stifel Nicolaus

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Stifel Nicolaus reiterated their buy rating on shares of InterXion Holding N.V. (NYSE:INXN) in a research report report published on Friday morning. Stifel Nicolaus currently has a $49.00 price target on the technology company’s stock. A number of other equities analysts also recently commented on INXN. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of InterXion Holding N.V. […]							Continue Reading








 



Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT) PT Set at $72.00 by Atlantic Securities

						 July 25th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Micah Haroldson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 



 
Atlantic Securities set a $72.00 target price on Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT) in a research note published on Friday. The firm currently has a neutral rating on the software giant’s stock. MSFT has been the topic of a number of other reports. Morgan Stanley reissued an overweight rating and set a $80.00 target price on shares […]							Continue Reading





Older Entries





















Free Email Newsletter

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow Watchlist News

 











Latest News



Schlumberger N.V. (NYSE:SLB) Receives Buy Rating from Seaport Global Securities					

LegacyTexas Financial Group, Inc. (LTXB) Rating Increased to Hold at Zacks Investment Research					

Kite Realty Group Trust (KRG) Rating Increased to Buy at Zacks Investment Research					

Range Resources Corporation (RRC) PT Lowered to $34.00 at Citigroup Inc.					

PPG Industries, Inc. (NYSE:PPG) Price Target Increased to $115.00 by Analysts at Deutsche Bank AG					

Skechers U.S.A., Inc. (NYSE:SKX) Price Target Raised to $34.00 at Citigroup Inc.					

Heartland Express, Inc. (NASDAQ:HTLD) Raised to Buy at Zacks Investment Research					

Southwestern Energy Company (SWN) Given New $8.00 Price Target at Citigroup Inc.					

La Quinta Holdings Inc. (NYSE:LQ) Downgraded to “Hold” at Zacks Investment Research					

Orix Corp Ads (IX) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Research					

HDFC Bank Limited (NYSE:HDB) Stock Rating Upgraded by Zacks Investment Research					

KeyCorp’s (KEY) Buy Rating Reaffirmed at Piper Jaffray Companies					

Home BancShares, Inc. (NASDAQ:HOMB) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Piper Jaffray Companies					

MB Financial Inc. (MBFI) Downgraded by Piper Jaffray Companies to “Neutral”					

Hess Midstream Partners LP (HESM) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research to “Hold”					

CGI Group, Inc. (GIB) Lifted to Strong-Buy at Zacks Investment Research					

Allscripts Healthcare Solutions, Inc. (NASDAQ:MDRX) Given “Hold” Rating at Piper Jaffray Companies					

Harvard Bioscience, Inc. (HBIO) Rating Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research					

Piper Jaffray Companies Reaffirms Buy Rating for Laureate Education Inc. (NASDAQ:LAUR)					

KB Financial Group Inc (NYSE:KB) Lifted to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research					



Archives

July 2017
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
March 2016
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015
February 2015
January 2015
December 2014
November 2014
October 2014
September 2014
August 2014
July 2014
June 2014
May 2014
April 2014
March 2014
February 2014
January 2014








			© Watch List News, LLC 2008-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Staff 
			| Contact 














































AMF PENSIONSFORSAKRING AB- Ratings & Rankings by Symmetric




 






























Home
About

Pricing

Login


























AMF PENSIONSFORSAKRING AB



Register for more
















 AMF Overview



												   Amf Pensionsforsakring Ab is an investment advisor. The manager's has disclosed holdings from 12/31/14 to 03/31/17.
												



Unlock Position Crowdedness, Turnover & Concentration









					
					 AMF StockAlpha 
					
					






-1.3%





Top 25%



2.5yr StockAlpha
Register for more...
















Fundamental & Technical Factor Exposure
										






Market Cap
Beta
Volatility


Momentum (12M)
Momentum (6M)
Momentum (3M)


Price/Book
Price/Earnings
Price/Cash Flow


Dividend Yield
Sales Growth
Earnings Growth


ROE
ROA
ROC


EBIDTA Margin
Debt/Assets
Hedge Fund Crowding









 AMF Since Last Filing Return Details
																										






Ticker
Size
Sector
Stock Move

StockAlpha Attribution
Days to Liquidate
Trade Crowdedness




MSFT
4.85%
Tech
12.39%

0.14%
0
32%



GOOGL
2.33%
Tech
17.75%

0.21%
0
38%





Unlock Positions and Returns Details














×
Register to Unlock



Unlock profile and also get:

Manager Positions and Return Details
Position Crowdedness, Turnover & Concentration
Manager Performance Estimates
Top Stock Pickers Report













We take your privacy seriously. Your information will never be shared with any third party











×
Download PDF Report


								Your requested report is being generated and will be emailed to you when ready. If you do not receive the report, please check your spam folder, email info@symmetric.io or call 866-243-4178
								














FEATURED IN





















 AMF Founders and Key Employees






Name
Title
In Position Since















 AMF Brokers, Custodians, Auditors and Administrators






Type
Company

















 AMF Investment Strategy


				
					   ...Unlock Full Investment Process Description







 AMF Portfolio Concentration




Unlock Portfolio Concentration











 AMF Location



 












  AMF Contact Information



							Phone Number: NULL
							Fax Number: NULL
							Website: null









READ RECENT SYMMETRIC REPORTS





















Disclaimer



				
		The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Symmetric and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Symmetric nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance and skill metrics are no guarantee of future results. "Symmetric," "Symmetric.io" and the Symmetric logo are marks of Symmetric, Inc. Read our privacy policy here. Read our terms of use here





















 Path A		  











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














pensionsforsakring - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images



Web Results

AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Buys Baker Hughes Inc, Sells ...

www.nasdaq.com/article/amf-pensionsforsakring-ab-buys-baker-hughes...


AMF Pensionsforsakring ABNew Purchases: BHI ,Reduced Positions: BLL , DXC ,Sold Out:BHGE,For the details of AMF Pensionsforsakring AB's stock buys.


AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Buys Baker Hughes Inc, Sells ...

https://www.gurufocus.com/news/544500/amf-pensionsforsakring-ab...


AMF Pensionsforsakring AB Buys Baker Hughes Inc, Sells Baker Hughes, a GE Co, Ball Corp, Stocks: BHI,BHGE,, release date:Jul 24, 2017


Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt Buys Facebook Inc ...

www.nasdaq.com/article/alecta-pensionsforsakring-omsesidigt-buys...


For the details of Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt's stock buys and sells, go to http://www.gurufocus.com/StockBuy.php?GuruName=Alecta ...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring Omsesidigt: Company Profile ...

https://www.bloomberg.com/profiles/companies/146180Z:SS-alecta...


Company profile & key executives for Alecta Pensionsforsakring Omsesidigt (146180Z:-) including description, corporate address, management team and contact info.


Alecta Pensionsforsakring Omsesidigt Has $131.12 Million ...

https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/24/alecta...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring Omsesidigt lowered its position in Graco Inc. (NYSE:GGG) by 2.7% during the second quarter, according to its most recent ...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt Increases Its ...

https://www.highlightpress.com/alecta-pensionsforsakring...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt says it bought 200,000 shares in quarter ending 06/30/2017 increasing its exposure to Ecolab Inc. by 8.8%. Its investment was ...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring Omsesidigt Maintains Position in ...

https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/24/autoliv-inc-nysealv...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring Omsesidigt maintained its stake in Autoliv, Inc. (NYSE:ALV) during the second quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F ...


Jul 06, 2017 - Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt Buys ...

https://www.gurufocus.com/news/537476/alecta-pensionsforsakring...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt Buys Facebook Inc, New York Community Bancorp Inc, Nike Inc, Sells Mead Johnson Nutrition Co, International Business Machines ...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt SEC 13F-HR filings ...

https://stockzoa.com/fund/alecta-pensionsforsakring-omsesidigt


Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt was a net seller of stock by $265.02M. Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt has $11.31B in assets under management (AUM ...


Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt Sells A Little More ...

www.highlightpress.com/alecta-pensionsforsakring-omsesidigt-sells...


TJX Companies, Inc. (The) (NYSE:TJX). Alecta Pensionsforsakring, Omsesidigt sold 225,000 shares in quarter ending 06/30/2017 decreasing its stake in TJX Companies ...


12345Next















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network








